Alaska, session 34, HB21.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 15.07.040 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 06 (b) A person who is at least 16 years of age and under 18 years of age may 07 preregister to vote. To preregister, a person shall supply the information required 08 under AS 15.07.060(a) to a registration official or a voter registration agency, except 09 that, instead of a declaration that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older within 10 90 days after the date of registration under AS 15.07.060(a)(6), the person shall supply 11 a declaration that the person will be 18 years of age or older within two years after the 12 date of preregistration. 13 (c) Ninety days before a person preregistered to vote under (b) of this section 14 reaches 18 years of age, the division shall send, by nonforwardable mail to the 01 person's registration mailing address, a notice requesting address confirmation or 02 correction. The notice must include a postage prepaid and pre-addressed return card on 03 which the person may state the person's current address. The notice must indicate that 04 the person should return the card not later than 45 days after the date of the notice and 05 that failure to return the card by the 45-day deadline could result in the person not 06 being registered to vote. If the person returns the card, the division shall register the 07 person when the person reaches 18 years of age and forward to the person a 08 registration card. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 15.07.195 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 10 (e) Notwithstanding another provision of this section, the address and 11 telephone number of a person under 18 years of age who registers or preregisters to 12 vote are confidential and not open to public inspection. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.